District of Columbia statutes.
29-604.01

Partner’s rights and duties.

(a)

Each partner shall deemed to have an account that is:

(1)

Credited with an amount equal to the money plus the value of any other property, net of the amount of any liabilities, the partner contributes to the partnership and the partner’s share of the partnership profits; and

(2)

Charged with an amount equal to the money plus the value of any other property, net of the amount of any liabilities, distributed by the partnership to the partner and the partner’s share of the partnership losses.

(b)

Each partner shall be entitled to an equal share of the partnership profits and shall be chargeable with a share of the partnership losses in proportion to the partner’s share of the profits.

(c)

A partnership shall reimburse a partner for payments made, and indemnify a partner for liabilities incurred, by the partner in the ordinary course of the business of the partnership or for the preservation of its business or property.

(d)

A partnership shall reimburse a partner for an advance to the partnership beyond the amount of capital the partner agreed to contribute.

(e)

A payment or advance made by a partner which gives rise to a partnership obligation under subsection (c) or (d) of this section shall constitute a loan to the partnership which accrues interest from the date of the payment or advance.

(f)

A partnership shall indemnify and hold harmless a person with respect to any claim or demand against the person and any debt, obligation, or other liability incurred by the person by reason of the person’s former or present capacity as partner, if the claim, demand, debt, obligation, or other liability does not arise from the person’s breach of this section, § 29-604.07, or § 29-610.02.

(g)

In the ordinary course of its business, a partnership may advance reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees and costs, incurred by a person in connection with a claim or demand against the person by reason of the person’s former or present capacity as a partner, if the person promises to repay the partnership if the person ultimately is determined not to be entitled to be indemnified under subsection (f) of this section.

(h)

A partnership may purchase or maintain insurance against liability arising from a partner’s status and asserted against or incurred by a partner acting in his or her capacity. Such insurance may be purchased and maintained even if, under § 29-601.04(b)(13), the partnership agreement does not permit limitation or elimination of partner liability.

(i)

Each partner shall have equal rights in the management and conduct of the partnership business.

(j)

A partner shall use or possess partnership property only on behalf of the partnership.

(k)

A partner shall not be entitled to remuneration for services performed for the partnership, except for reasonable compensation for services rendered in winding up the business of the partnership.

(l)

A difference arising as to a matter in the ordinary course of business of a partnership shall be decided by a majority of the partners. An act outside the ordinary course of business of a partnership and an amendment to the partnership agreement shall be undertaken only with the consent of all of the partners.

(m)

This section shall not affect the debts, liabilities, or other obligations of a partnership to other persons under § 29-603.01.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(4)(A), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-604.08 and § 29-609.03.
1981 Ed., § 41-154.1.
2001 Ed., § 33-104.01.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added (f), (g), and (h); repealed former (i) and (j); and redesignated former (f) through (h) as (i) through (k), respectively; and redesignated former (k) and (l) as (l) and (m), respectively.

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 401 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.